Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,163
Collection system; additional remedy.

The collection remedy authorized by sections 77-27,160 to 77-27,173 is in addition to and not in substitution for any other remedy available by law.

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 9.